Maine, session 132, LD1054.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Maine as follows:
Sec. 1. 33 MRSA §476, sub-§1, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 395, §3, is amended to
read:
1. Conservation easement. "Conservation easement" means a nonpossessory interest
of a holder in real property imposing limitations or affirmative obligations the purposes of
which include retaining or protecting natural, scenic or open space values of real property;
assuring its availability for agricultural, forest, recreational or open space use; protecting
natural resources; or maintaining or enhancing air or water quality of real property; or
preserving the historical, architectural, archaeological or cultural aspects of real property.
Sec. 2. 33 MRSA §476, sub-§2, ¶A, as enacted by PL 1985, c. 395, §3, is amended
to read:
A. A governmental body empowered to hold an interest in real property under the laws
of this State or the United States, including a federally recognized Indian nation, tribe
or band in the State; or
Page 1 - 132LR1539(03)